Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5377XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2017 Section 1. Section 708.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 708.6 Intimidation with a dangerous weapon. 3 1. A person commits a class âCâ felony when the person, 4 with the intent to injure or provoke fear or anger in another, 5 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon at , 6 into, or in a building, vehicle, airplane, railroad engine, 7 railroad car, or boat, occupied by another person, or within 8 an assembly of people, and thereby places the occupants or 9 people placing the other person in reasonable apprehension 10 of serious injury , or threatens to commit such an act under 11 circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat 12 will be carried out. 13 2. A person commits a class âDâ felony when the person 14 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon at , 15 into, or in a building, vehicle, airplane, railroad engine, 16 railroad car, or boat, occupied by another person, or within 17 an assembly of people, and thereby places the occupants or 18 people placing the other person in reasonable apprehension 19 of serious injury , or threatens to commit such an act under 20 circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat 21 will be carried out. 22